Wisconsin, session 2025, SB852.
do enact as follows:SB852,11Section 1. 20.255 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB852,2,6220.255 (2) (b) Aids for special education and school age parents programs. The 3amounts in the schedule A sum sufficient for the payment of the full cost of special 4education for children in hospitals and convalescent homes under s. 115.88 (4) and 5for the payment of aids for special education and school age parents programs 6under ss. 115.88, 115.93 and 118.255 as provided under s. 115.882.SB852,27Section 2. 115.882 of the statutes is amended to read:SB852,2,178115.882 Payment of state aid; reimbursement rate. Funds appropriated 9under s. 20.255 (2) (b) shall be used first for the purpose of s. 115.88 (4). Costs In 10the 2025-26 school year, costs eligible for reimbursement from the appropriation 11under s. 20.255 (2) (b) under ss. 115.88 (1m) to (3), (6), and (8), 115.93, and 118.255 12(4) shall be reimbursed at a rate set to distribute the full amount appropriated for 13reimbursement for the costs, not to exceed 100 percent 42 percent of eligible costs. 14In the 2026-27 school year and in each school year thereafter, costs eligible for 15reimbursement from the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (b) under ss. 115.88 (1m) 16to (3), (6), and (8), 115.93, and 118.255 (4) shall be reimbursed at 45 percent of 17eligible costs.SB852,2,1818